Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB993.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Chapter 96 of Title 51 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a subchapter to read:SECTION 1. TITLE 51 OF THE PENNSYLVANIA CONSOLIDATED STATUTES IS AMENDED BY ADDING A SECTION TO READ:§ 106. CONSOLIDATED ANNUAL REPORT.(A) REQUIREMENT.--ANY REQUIREMENT UNDER THIS TITLE FOR THE DEPARTMENT, THE ADJUTANT GENERAL OR ANY BOARD, COMMISSION OR COUNCIL ESTABLISHED UNDER THIS TITLE TO SUBMIT AN ANNUAL, BIENNIAL OR RECURRING REPORT TO THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OR ANY OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY'S COMMITTEES SHALL BE FULFILLED THROUGH THE <--<--<--1234567891011121314151617 SUBMISSION OF A SINGLE CONSOLIDATED ANNUAL REPORT.(B) SUBMISSION DEADLINE.--THE CONSOLIDATED ANNUAL REPORT SHALL COVER THE PRECEDING CALENDAR YEAR AND SHALL BE SUBMITTED TO THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY BEGINNING MARCH 1, 2027, AND NO LATER THAN MARCH 1 OF EACH YEAR THEREAFTER.(C) CONTENTS.--THE CONSOLIDATED ANNUAL REPORT SHALL INCLUDE:(1) A SUMMARY OF THE DEPARTMENT'S CURRENT OPERATIONS, INCLUDING ONGOING PROGRAMS, SERVICES PROVIDED, STAFFING LEVELS AND USE OF APPROPRIATED FUNDS.(2) A FORWARD-LOOKING NARRATIVE OF THE DEPARTMENT'S FUTURE PLANS, PRIORITIES AND ANTICIPATED OPERATIONAL INITIATIVES, INCLUDING MAJOR BUDGETARY OR PROGRAMMATIC CHANGES.(3) THE INFORMATION REQUIRED UNDER THE FOLLOWING PROVISIONS, TO THE EXTENT APPLICABLE:(I) SECTION 506.1(B) (RELATING TO USE OF PENNSYLVANIA NATIONAL GUARD FOR SPECIAL STATE DUTY).(II) SECTION 712(F) (RELATING TO VETERANS REGISTRY).(III) SECTION 1712(14) (RELATING TO SPECIFIC DUTIES).(IV) SECTION 1721(F) (RELATING TO VETERANS' TRUST FUND).(V) SECTION 7319(I) (RELATING TO MILITARY FAMILY RELIEF ASSISTANCE).(VI) SECTION 7701 (RELATING TO BLIND VETERAN'S PENSION).(VII) SECTION 9304(H) (RELATING TO GRANTS TO VETERANS' SERVICE OFFICER PROGRAMS).(VIII) SECTION 9810 (RELATING TO REPORT).(IX) ANY OTHER RECURRING OR CONTINUING REPORT 20250HB0993PN3229 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 REQUIRED UNDER THIS TITLE OR BY ADMINISTRATIVE DIRECTIVE.(D) FORMAT AND AVAILABILITY.--THE CONSOLIDATED REPORT SHALL BE MADE AVAILABLE IN BOTH DIGITAL AND PRINT FORMATS AND PUBLISHED ON THE DEPARTMENT'S PUBLICLY ACCESSIBLE INTERNET WEBSITE. A COPY SHALL BE PROVIDED TO THE CHAIRPERSON AND MINORITY CHAIRPERSON OF THE VETERANS AFFAIRS AND EMERGENCY PREPAREDNESS COMMITTEE OF THE SENATE AND THE CHAIRPERSON AND MINORITY CHAIRPERSON OF THE VETERANS AFFAIRS AND EMERGENCY PREPAREDNESS COMMITTEE OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES.SECTION 1.1. CHAPTER 96 OF TITLE 51 IS AMENDED BY ADDING A SUBCHAPTER TO READ:SUBCHAPTER DVETERAN-OWNED BUSINESS LOGOTYPESec.9621. Definitions.9622. Veteran-owned business logotype.§ 9621. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this subchapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Veteran-owned business." A business owned or controlled by a veteran. A business is controlled or owned by a veteran if at least 51% of the ownership interest in the business is held by a veteran.§ 9622. Veteran-owned business logotype.(a) Logotype.--(1) No later than 30 days after the effective date of this paragraph, the department shall develop and design an official veteran-owned business logotype to be used by a veteran-owned business.20250HB0993PN3229 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) The logotype shall not include any language that may be construed as an endorsement by the Commonwealth and shall only indicate that the business is a veteran-owned business.(b) Application.--No later than 30 days after the effective date of this subsection, the department , in consultation with the Department of Community and Economic Development, shall develop an application for which a veteran-owned business may apply to use the logotype under subsection (a). The application shall be posted on the department's publicly accessible Internet website.(c) Eligibility.--The department shall develop guidelines with the criteria to establish veteran-owned status of businesses applying for the logotype. The criteria shall be made available on the department's publicly accessible Internet website.(d) Contributions.--The department may provide a space on the application where an applicant may voluntarily make a contribution of any amount to be deposited into the Veterans' Trust Fund.(e) Public notice.--Within 30 days of the creation of a logotype under this section, the department shall post on the department's publicly accessible Internet website a notice that:(1) The logotype under this section is available for use by an approved veteran-owned business.(2) Includes instructions on how to complete and submit an application.(f) Notice of decision.--Within 60 days of receiving an application under this subchapter, the department , in consultation with the Department of Community and Economic Development, shall decide and notify the applicant of whether 20250HB0993PN3229 - 4 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the applicant is approved to use and display the logotype. The department shall inform the applicant of training courses in business ownership and management, including courses with a focus on business ownership and management by a veteran, offered by small business development centers.(G) COORDINATION WITH OTHER DEPARTMENTS.--THE DEPARTMENT SHALL COLLABORATE WITH OTHER COMMONWEALTH AGENCIES TO INTEGRATE THE VETERAN-OWNED BUSINESS LOGO INTO PROGRAMS THAT SUPPORT VETERAN-OWNED BUSINESSES.(H) WEBSITE.--THE DEPARTMENT SHALL DEVELOP A PUBLICLY ACCESSIBLE ONLINE DATABASE LISTING VETERAN-OWNED BUSINESSES THAT HAVE BEEN AWARDED THE LOGOTYPE.(I) ADMINISTRATOR.--THE DEPARTMENT SHALL:(1) EMPLOY AN ADMINISTRATOR TO OVERSEE THE CERTIFICATION, SUPPORT AND PROMOTION OF THE VETERAN-OWNED BUSINESS LOGOTYPE IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SUBCHAPTER; AND(2) ENSURE COMPLIANCE WITH ELIGIBILITY REQUIREMENTS UNDER THIS SUBCHAPTER.(g) (J) Coordinator.--The Department of Community and Economic Development, in consultation with the department, DEPARTMENT shall employ a veteran-owned business coordinator to assist veterans who own, operate or seek to own or operate a business. The department and the Department of Community and Economic Development shall post on their publicly accessible Internet websites, a telephone number and email address for the veteran-owned business coordinator.(h) (K) Penalty.-- (1) In addition to any other penalty prescribed by law, an individual commits a misdemeanor of the third degree if the individual fraudulently holds the individual out to be a 20250HB0993PN3229 - 5 - <--<--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 veteran for the purpose of using a logotype under this subchapter.(2) The full amount of each fine collected for a violation of paragraph (1) shall be deposited into the Veterans' Trust Fund.(i) (L) Report.--By March 31 1 of each year, the department , in consultation with the Department of Community and Economic Development, shall prepare an annual report on the number of veteran-owned businesses approved to use the logotype and the number of applications received. A copy of the report shall be sent to the Veterans Affairs and Emergency Preparedness Committee of the Senate and the Veterans Affairs and Emergency Preparedness Committee of the House of Representatives.Section 2. The Department of Military and Veterans Affairs may issue guidelines to implement and administer the addition of 51 Pa.C.S. Ch. 96 Subch. D.Section 3. This act shall take effect as follows:(1) The addition of 51 Pa.C.S. § 9622(g) shall take effect in 180 days.(2) This section shall take effect immediately.(3) The remainder of this act shall take effect in 60 days.SECTION 3. THIS ACT SHALL TAKE EFFECT SEPTEMBER 1, 2026, OR IMMEDIATELY, WHICHEVER IS LATER. 2027.20250HB0993PN3229 - 6 - <--<--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324